District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

26-551.04

Appointment of the Commissioner of the Department of Banking and Financial Institutions.

Repealed.

History

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-308, § 104, 48 DCR 3244
June 11, 2004, D.C. Law 15-166, § 2(c), 51 DCR 2817

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 2(c) of Consolidation of Financial Services Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-381, February 27, 2004, 51 DCR 2653).